North Dakota statutes. TITLE 16.1 Elections
CHAPTER 16.1-08.1 Campaign Contribution Statements
16.1-08.1-03.5.
Corporate contributions and expenditures — Statement required.

Corporations, cooperative corporations, limited liability companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, and associations may make expenditures and contributions for promoting any general political philosophy or belief deemed in the best interest of the employees, stockholders, patrons, or members of the corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association other than a “political purpose” as defined by this chapter. A corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association may not make a contribution for a political purpose.

A corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association may make a donation of property or money to a state political party or nonprofit entity affiliated with or under the control of a state political party for deposit in a separate and segregated building fund.

A corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association may make an expenditure to a measure committee as described in section 16.1-08.1-01 for the purpose of promoting the passage or defeat of an initiated or referred measure or petition or make an expenditure to any other person that makes an independent expenditure. A corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association may make an independent expenditure for a political purpose, including political advertising in support of or opposition to a candidate, political committee, or a political party, or for the purpose of promoting passage or defeat of initiated or referred measures or petitions. The corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association shall file a statement disclosing any expenditure made under this subsection with the secretary of state within forty-eight hours after making the expenditure. The statement must include:

The full name of the corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association;

The complete address of the corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association;

The name of the recipient of the expenditure;

If the expenditure is related to a measure or petition, the title of the measure or petition and whether the expenditure is made in support of or opposition to the measure or petition;

If the expenditure is related to a measure, the election date on which the measure either will appear or did appear on the ballot;

The amount of the expenditure;

The cumulative total amount of expenditures since the beginning of the calendar year which are required to be reported under this subsection;

The telephone number and the printed name and signature of the individual completing the statement, attesting to the statement being true, complete, and correct; and

The date on which the statement was signed.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 207, § 16; 1997, ch. 194, § 7; 2003, ch. 176, § 7; 2011, ch. 155, § 3; 2013, ch. 172, § 7; 2015, ch. 159, § 5, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 155, § 9, effective February 1, 2018.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 159, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

Collateral References.

Construction and Application of Supreme Court’s Holding in

Citizens United v. Federal Election Com’n,

130 S. Ct. 876, 175 L. Ed. 2d 753, 187 L.R.R.M. (BNA) 2961, 159 Lab. Cas. (CCH) P 10166 (2010), That Government May Not Prohibit Independent and Indirect Corporate Expenditures on Political Speech. 65 A.L.R.6th 503.

Construction and Application of Supreme Court’s Holding in

Citizens United v. Federal Election Com’n,

130 S. Ct. 876, 558 U.S. 310, 175 L. Ed. 2d 753, 187 L.R.R.M. (BNA) 2961, 159 Lab. Cas. (CCH) P 10166 (2010), That Government May Not Prohibit Independent and Indirect Corporate Expenditures on Political Speech. 65 A.L.R.6th 503.

16.1-08.1-03.6.
Contributions from federal campaign committee accounts or from contributions made to other candidates or former candidates limited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 202, § 7.

16.1-08.1-03.7.
Political committees that organize and register according to federal law that make independent expenditures or disbursements to nonfederal candidates, political parties, and political committees.

A political committee that organizes and registers according to federal law and makes an independent expenditure or makes a disbursement in excess of two hundred dollars to a nonfederal candidate seeking public office or to a political party or political committee in this state shall file a copy of that portion of the committee’s federal report detailing the independent expenditure or the disbursement made. The political committee shall file a copy of the committee’s federal report, and supplementary information as necessary under this section, with the secretary of state at the time of filing the report with the applicable federal agency. The report and supplementary information must include:

The name, mailing address, and treasurer of the political committee;

The recipient’s name and mailing address;

The date and amount of the independent expenditure or disbursement; and

The ultimate and true source of funds listed by contributor and subcontributor of any amount over two hundred dollars collected or used to make the independent expenditure or disbursement including:

The name and address of the contributor;

The total amount of the contribution; and

The date the last contribution was received.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 204, § 8; 2003, ch. 176, § 8; 2013, ch. 172, § 8; 2019, ch. 472, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

16.1-08.1-03.8.
Contributions statement required of multicandidate political committees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2003, ch. 176, § 9; 2005, ch. 188, § 6; 2013, ch. 172, § 9; Repealed by 2017, ch. 155, § 13, eff February 1, 2018.

16.1-08.1-03.9.
Contribution statements of judicial district candidates or a candidate committee for a judicial district candidate. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 176, § 13; 2005, ch. 188, § 7; 2007, ch. 194, § 5; 2009, ch. 184, § 3; 2013, ch. 172, § 10; 2015, ch. 159, § 6, effective August 1, 2015; Repealed by 2017, ch. 155, § 13, eff February 1, 2018.

16.1-08.1-03.10.
Contribution statements of county office candidates or a candidate committee for a county office candidate. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 188, § 8; 2013, ch. 172, § 11; Repealed by 2017, ch. 155, § 13, eff February 1, 2018.

16.1-08.1-03.11.
Contribution statements of city office candidates or a candidate committee for a city office candidate in cities with a resident population of five thousand or more as determined by the last federal decennial census. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 188, § 8; 2007, ch. 194, § 6; 2013, ch. 172, § 12; Repealed by 2017, ch. 155, § 13, eff February 1, 2018.

16.1-08.1-03.12.
Contribution statements of incidental committees and other political committees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 193, § 2; 2013, ch. 172, § 13; 2015, ch. 159, § 7, effective August 1, 2015; Repealed by 2017, ch. 155, § 13, eff February 1, 2018.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017."

16.1-08.1-03.13.
Contribution statements required of initiated or referendum petition sponsoring committees — Statement of petition sponsors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 172, § 14; 2015, ch. 159, § 8, effective August 1, 2015; Repealed by 2017, ch. 155, § 13, eff February 1, 2018.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017."

16.1-08.1-03.14.
Conduit required to provide detailed contribution information to recipient.

A conduit that transfers any contribution to a candidate, political party, or political committee shall provide the recipient of the contribution a detailed statement that lists the name and address of each individual contributor, the amount of each contribution, and the date each contribution was received. The conduit also shall include on the statement the occupation, employer, and principal place of business of each contributor, or the political committee if not already registered according to state or federal law, which contributed five thousand dollars or more in the aggregate during a reporting period applicable to the candidate, political party, or political committee. The conduit shall provide the statement to the candidate, political party, or political committee in a manner to allow the candidate, political party, or political committee to file any statement required to be filed under this chapter.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 163, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

16.1-08.1-03.15.
Contributions from and expenditures by foreign nationals prohibited.

A foreign national may not make or offer to make, directly or indirectly, a contribution or expenditure in connection with any election.

A candidate, candidate committee, political party, or any other person may not solicit, accept, or receive, directly or indirectly, a contribution from a foreign national.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “foreign national” means a person that is:

A foreign government;

A foreign political party;

A foreign corporation, partnership, association, organization, or other combination of persons organized under the laws of or having its principal place of business in a foreign country;

An individual with foreign citizenship; or

An individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States and is not admitted lawfully to the United States for permanent residence.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 157, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

16.1-08.1-04.
Supplemental statement required on large contributions received after original statement — Filing time. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 244, § 4; 1983, ch. 245, § 5; 1987, ch. 250, § 3; 1993, ch. 212, § 5; 2001, ch. 202, § 5; 2001, ch. 208, § 1; 2003, ch. 176, § 10; 2005, ch. 188, § 10; 2013, ch. 172, § 15; Repealed by 2017, ch. 155, § 13, eff February 1, 2018.

16.1-08.1-04.1.
Personal use of contributions prohibited.

A candidate may not use any contribution received by the candidate, the candidate’s candidate committee, or a multicandidate political committee to:

Give a personal benefit to the candidate or another person;

Make a loan to another person;

Knowingly pay more than the fair market value for goods or services purchased for the campaign; or

Pay a criminal fine or civil penalty.

If the secretary of state has substantial reason to believe any person knowingly violated this section, the secretary shall arrange for an audit as authorized by section 16.1-08.1-05.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 155, § 10, effective February 1, 2018; 2019, ch. 472, § 3, effective January 5, 2021; 2021, ch. 450, § 1, effective April 20, 2021.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

16.1-08.1-05.
Audit by secretary of state — Requested audits — Reports.

If a substantial irregularity is evident or reasonably alleged, the secretary of state may arrange an audit of any statement filed pursuant to this chapter, to be performed by a certified public accountant of the filer’s choice, subject to approval by the secretary of state. If an audit of a statement arranged by the secretary of state under this subsection reveals a violation of this chapter, the candidate, political party, political committee, or other person filing the statement shall pay a fine to the secretary of state equal to two hundred percent of the aggregate of contributions and expenditures found to be in violation or an amount sufficient to pay the cost of the audit, whichever is greater. If an audit of a statement arranged by the secretary of state under this subsection does not reveal a violation of this chapter, the cost of the audit must be paid for by the secretary of state.

If a substantial irregularity is reasonably alleged, the secretary of state may arrange an audit of any statement filed pursuant to this chapter, performed by a certified public accountant of the filer’s choice, subject to approval by the secretary of state, upon written request by any interested party made to the secretary of state within thirty days following receipt of a statement by the secretary of state. The request must be made in writing, recite a substantial irregularity and a lawful reason for requesting an audit, and be accompanied by a bond in an amount established by the secretary of state sufficient to pay the cost of the audit. If an audit of a statement arranged by the secretary of state under this subsection reveals a violation of this chapter, the candidate, political party, or political committee filing the statement shall pay a fine to the secretary of state equal to two hundred percent of the aggregate of contributions and expenditures found to be in violation or an amount sufficient to pay the cost of the audit, whichever is greater, and the bond shall be returned to the person submitting it. If an audit of a statement arranged by the secretary of state under this subsection does not reveal a violation of this chapter, the cost of the audit must be satisfied from the bond filed with the secretary of state.

An audit may not be made or requested of a statement for the sole reason that it was not timely filed with the secretary of state. An audit made or arranged according to this section must audit only those items required to be included in any statement, registration, or report filed with the secretary of state according to this chapter. The secretary of state may collect any payment obligation arising out of this section by civil action or by assignment to a collection agency, with any costs of collection to be added to the amount owed and to be paid by the delinquent filer. Any remaining moneys collected by the secretary of state after an audit is paid for under this section must be deposited in the state’s general fund. This section does not apply to statements filed by candidates or candidate committees for candidates for county or city offices.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 244, § 5; 2003, ch. 176, § 11; 2007, ch. 194, § 7; 2013, ch. 172, § 16; 2017, ch. 155, § 11, effective February 1, 2018.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

16.1-08.1-06.
Contributions and expenditure statement requirements.

Any statement required by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state must be:

Filed electronically with the secretary of state and must be within the prescribed time and in the format established by the secretary of state. If the secretary of state does not receive a statement, an electronic duplicate of the statement must be promptly filed upon notice by the secretary of state of its nonreceipt. After a statement has been filed, the secretary of state may request or accept written clarification along with an amended statement from a candidate, political party, or political committee filing the statement when discrepancies, errors, or omissions on the statement are discovered by the secretary of state, the candidate, political party, or political committee filing the statement, or by any interested party reciting a lawful reason for requesting clarification and an amendment be made. When requesting an amended statement, the secretary of state shall establish a reasonable period of time, not to exceed ten days, agreed to by the candidate, political party, or political committee, for filing the amended statement with the secretary of state.

Preserved by the secretary of state for a period of ten years from the date of the filing deadline. The statement is to be considered a part of the public records of the secretary of state’s office and must be open to public inspection on the internet.

In determining the amount of individual contributions from any contributor, all amounts received from the same contributor during the reporting period must be aggregated to report an overall total contribution for the purposes of the statements required by this chapter. Aggregate contributions must reference the date of the most recent contribution. Contributions made separately by different persons from joint accounts are considered separate contributions for reporting purposes.

In reporting a contribution received through a conduit, a candidate, political party, or political committee shall list each reportable contribution identifying the person that submitted the contribution to the conduit and provide the required information regarding the contribution from that person rather than identifying the conduit as the contributor.

Any statement and data filed with the secretary of state must be made available on the internet to the public free of charge within twenty-four hours after filing.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 244, § 6; 1995, ch. 207, § 17; 1997, ch. 194, § 8; 1999, ch. 204, § 9; 2001, ch. 202, § 6; 2003, ch. 176, § 12; 2007, ch. 194, § 8; 2013, ch. 172, § 17; 2015, ch. 159, § 9, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 163, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 156, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 159, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 163, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 159, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 16.1-08.1-06 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2299; and Section 9 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1309.

16.1-08.1-06.1.
Filing officer to charge and collect fees for late filing.

If a statement or report required to be filed according to this chapter is not filed within the prescribed time, the filing officer to whom the report was to be filed is authorized to charge and collect a late fee as follows:

Within six days after the prescribed time, twenty-five dollars;

Within eleven days after the prescribed time, fifty dollars; and

Thereafter, one hundred dollars.

A filing officer may require an amendment to be filed for any statement or report that is incorrect or incomplete. The amendment must be filed with the filing officer within ten business days after the amendment has been requested in writing. If an amendment is not filed within the prescribed time, the filing officer is authorized to charge and collect a late fee as follows:

Within six days after the date the amendment was due, fifty dollars;

Within eleven days after the date the amendment was due, one hundred dollars; and

Thereafter, two hundred dollars.

The filing officer may collect any payment obligation arising out of this section by civil action or by assignment to a collection agency, with any costs of collection to be added to the amount owed and to be paid by the delinquent filer.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 176, § 14; 2005, ch. 188, § 11; 2013, ch. 172, § 18.

16.1-08.1-06.2.
Secretary of state to provide instructions, make adjustments for inflation, and conduct training.

The secretary of state shall provide instructions and conduct training for the purpose of promoting uniform application of campaign finance and disclosure requirements and the uniform filing of statements, registrations, or reports according to this chapter. The secretary also shall determine adjustments for inflation of the reporting thresholds in this chapter and instruct persons submitting reports under this chapter of the adjustments. On January first of each year, the secretary shall determine whether the accumulated change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers (all items, United States city average), as applied to each reporting threshold in this chapter, would result in an adjustment of at least ten dollars of the threshold in effect on that date. If so, the secretary shall deem the reporting threshold adjusted by ten dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 176, § 15; 2019, ch. 472, § 4, effective January 5, 2021.

16.1-08.1-07.
Penalty.

Except as otherwise provided, any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 244, § 7; 1995, ch. 207, § 18; 2013, ch. 172, § 19.

16.1-08.1-08
Ultimate and true source of funds — Required identification.

In any statement under this chapter which requires the identification of a contributor or subcontributor, the ultimate and true source of funds must be identified.

A resident taxpayer may commence an action in a district court of this state against a person required to comply with this section to compel compliance if all other enforcement measures under this chapter have been exhausted and the taxpayer reasonably believes the person has failed to comply with this section.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 472, § 5, effective January 5, 2021.